California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 836, Sec. 2.   (SB 996)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

214.18.

(a) Property is within the exemption provided by Sections 4 and 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution if the property is owned by a community land trust, otherwise qualifying for exemption under Section 214, and all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The property is being or will be developed or rehabilitated as any of the following:

(A) An owner-occupied single-family dwelling.

(B) As an owner-occupied unit in a multifamily dwelling.

(C) As a member-occupied unit in a limited equity housing
 cooperative.

(D) As a rental housing development.

(2) Improvements on the property are or will be available for use and ownership or for rent by qualified persons.

(3) (A) A deed restriction or other instrument, requiring a contract or contracts serving as an enforceable restriction on the sale or resale value of owner-occupied units or on the affordability of rental units is recorded on or before the lien date following the acquisition of the property by the community land trust.

(B) For purposes of this section:

(i) “A contract or contracts serving as an enforceable
 restriction on the sale or resale value of owner-occupied units” means a contract described in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 402.1.

(ii) “A contract or contracts serving as an enforceable restriction on the affordability of rental units” means an enforceable and verifiable agreement with a public agency, a recorded deed restriction, or other legal document described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 214.

(C) A copy of the deed restriction or other instrument shall be provided to the assessor.

(b) (1) Subject to subdivision (d), the exemption provided by subdivision (a) shall not be denied to a property on the basis that the property does not
 currently contain a single-family dwelling, a unit in a multifamily dwelling, a unit in a limited equity housing cooperative, or a rental housing development that is in the course of construction.

(2) Once property that is a rental housing development is in the course of construction, the property shall be deemed to qualify for the exemption provided under Section 214 and on subsequent lien dates the property shall qualify for exemption pursuant to Section 214.

(c) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Community land trust” has the same meaning as that term is defined in clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 402.1.

(2) “Course of construction” has the same meaning as the term “facilities in the course of construction,” as used and defined in Sections 214.1 and 214.2.

(3) “Limited equity housing cooperative” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 817 of the Civil Code.

(4) “Persons and families of low income” has the same meaning as the term “lower income households,” as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) “Persons and families of low or moderate income” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) “Qualified persons”
 means the following:

(A) In the case of property developed for owner-occupied housing, as described in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), persons and families of low or moderate income, including persons and families of low or moderate income that own a dwelling or unit collectively as member occupants or resident shareholders of a limited equity
 housing cooperative.

(B) In the case of property developed for rental housing, as described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), persons and families of low income.

(7) “Rental housing development” means a rental housing development in which all of the residential units in the development, other than units provided to property managers, are required to be rented to, and occupied by, persons and families of low or moderate income, at rents that do not exceed an affordable rent as described in Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the community land trust shall be liable for property tax for the years for which the property
 was exempt from taxation pursuant to this section if the property was not developed or rehabilitated, or if the development or rehabilitation is not in the course of construction, in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) as follows:

(A) In the case of property acquired by the community land trust before January 1, 2022, by January 1, 2027.

(B) In the case of property acquired by the community land trust on and after January 1, 2022,
 and before January 1, 2027, within
 five years of the lien date following the acquisition of the property by the community land trust.

(2) The community land trust shall notify the assessor of the county in which the property is located if property owned by the community land trust granted an exemption pursuant to this section is not in the course of construction by the dates specified in paragraph (1).

(e) Property shall be eligible for exemption pursuant to this section as follows:

(1) In the case of property acquired by the community land trust before January 1,
 2022,
 for lien dates occurring on and after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2027.

(2) (A) In the case of property acquired by the community land trust on and after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, for the first five lien dates following the acquisition of the property by the community land trust.

(B) Property shall be eligible for exemption for the lien dates specified in subparagraph
 (A) regardless of the repeal of this section.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 656, Sec. 1.   (AB 2651)   Effective September 28, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

214.19.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Total exemption amount limitation” means the assessed value exemption amount limitation with respect to a single property or multiple properties that is specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 214, as that section read before January 1, 2019.

(2) (A) “Qualified
 property” means property used exclusively for rental housing and related facilities where 90 percent or more of the occupants of the property are lower income households whose rent does not exceed the rent prescribed by Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code and that qualifies for exemption under Section 214 on the sole basis of this criteria as specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 214.

(B) “Qualified property” does not include property owned by a limited partnership in which the managing general partner is an eligible nonprofit organization, as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 214.

(3) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer subject to the total exemption amount limitation.

(4) “Qualified claim” means a claim for exemption that was filed for a qualified property with the assessor on and after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2019, for which the assessor granted a partial exemption.

(5) “Qualified ad valorem tax in excess of the total exemption amount limitation, and related interest or penalty” means that ad valorem tax levied to a qualified taxpayer on qualified property with respect to a single property or multiple
 properties that does not exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in assessed value and any interest or penalty imposed with regard to that portion of
 assessed value that was in excess of the assessed value exemption amount limitation.

(b) (1) Any outstanding qualified ad valorem tax in excess of the total exemption amount limitation, and related interest or penalty, which was levied or imposed on and after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2019, with respect to a qualified property for which a qualified claim was filed, shall be canceled to the extent that the amount canceled does not result in a total assessed value exemption amount in excess of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) being allowed to a qualified taxpayer with respect to a
 single property or multiple properties that are qualified property for any fiscal year.

(2) On or after January 1, 2019, an escape assessment shall not be levied on qualified property if that amount would be subject to cancellation under paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 694, Sec. 2.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

215.

All personal property owned by a veteran organization which has been chartered by the Congress of the United States, when the same are used solely and exclusively for the purposes of such organization, if not conducted for profit and no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private individual or member thereof, shall be exempt from taxation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

215.1.

(a) All buildings, and so much of the real property on which the buildings are situated as may be required for the convenient use and occupation of the buildings, used exclusively for charitable purposes, owned by a veterans’ organization which has been chartered by the Congress of the United States, organized and operated for charitable purposes, when the same are used solely and exclusively for the purpose of the organization, if not conducted for profit and no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private individual or member thereof, shall be exempt from taxation.

(b) The exemption provided for in this section shall apply to the property of all organizations meeting the requirements of this
 section and subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 214.

(c) An organization that files a claim for the exemption provided for in this section shall file with the assessor a valid organizational clearance certificate issued pursuant to Section 254.6.

(d) (1) This exemption shall be known as the “veterans’ organization exemption.”

(2) Notwithstanding Section 20 or any other law, the State Board of Equalization is responsible for administering the veterans’ organization exemption provided by this section, except where the law places responsibility for administering that exemption with the county assessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 55.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

215.2.

Property owned by an organization that satisfies the requirements of Section 214, 215, or 215.1 and which is used primarily for exempt purposes shall not be denied the welfare or veterans organization exemption because such property is also used for conducting bingo games pursuant to Section 326.5 of the Penal Code, provided that the proceeds from such games are used exclusively for the charitable purposes of such organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 271.)
-------------------------------------------

215.5.

All personal property owned or leased by a nonprofit corporation, which does not accept advertising for a consideration and is engaged exclusively in the production of programs for educational television, and all personal property owned or leased by a nonprofit educational organization, which is engaged exclusively in the production of programs as a noncommercial educational FM or AM broadcast station, shall be exempt from taxation, if such personal property is used solely and exclusively for the purposes of such organization or corporation and no part of the corporation’s or organization’s net earnings inure to the benefit of any private shareholder or
 individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1394.)
-------------------------------------------

216.

The stock in trade up to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) of a vending stand operated by a blind person licensed by the Bureau of Vocational Rehabilitation pursuant to federal or state law is exempt from taxation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1638.)
-------------------------------------------

217.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the following articles of personal property that have been made available for display in a publicly owned art gallery or museum, or a museum that is regularly open to the public and that is operated by a nonprofit organization that qualifies for exemption pursuant to Section 23701d, shall be exempt from taxation:

(1) Original paintings in oil, mineral, water, vitreous enamel, or other colors, pastels, original mosaics, original drawings
 and sketches in pen, ink, pencil, or watercolors, or works of the free fine arts in any other media including applied paper and other materials, manufactured or otherwise, that are used on collages, artists’ proof etchings unbound, and engravings and woodcuts unbound, lithographs, or prints made by other hand transfer processes unbound, or original sculptures or statuary. As used in this subdivision:

(A) “Sculpture” and “statuary” shall include professional productions of sculptors only whether in round or in relief, in bronze, marble, stone, terra cotta, ivory, wood, metal, or other materials, or whether cut, carved, or otherwise wrought by hand from the solid block or mass of marble, stone, alabaster, or from metal, or other materials, or cast in bronze or other metal or substance, or from wax or plaster, or constructed from any material or made in any form as the professional productions of sculptors, only.

(B) “Original” when used to modify the words “sculptures” and “statuary” shall include the original work or model and the first 10 castings, replicas, or reproductions made from the sculptor’s original work or model, with or without a change in scale, regardless of whether or not the sculptor is alive at the time the castings, replicas, or reproductions are completed.

(C) “Painting,” “mosaic,” “drawing,” “work of the free fine arts,” “sketch,” “sculpture,” and “statuary” shall not include any articles of utility, articles designed for industrial use, or any articles that are made wholly or in part by stenciling or any other mechanical process.

(D) “Etchings,” “engravings,” “woodcuts,” “lithographs,” or “prints made by other hand transfer processes,” shall include only works that are printed by hand from plates, stones
 or blocks etched, drawn, or engraved with handtools and do not include works that are printed from plates, stones or blocks etched, drawn, or engraved by photochemical or other mechanical processes.

(2) Original works of the free fine arts, that are not described in paragraph (1), are subject to regulations, as the board may prescribe, to prove that the article represents some school, kind, or medium of the free fine arts. As used in this paragraph, “original works of the free fine arts” shall not include any article of utility or any article designed for industrial use.

(b) When making a claim for an exemption pursuant to this section, a person claiming the exemption shall provide all information required and answer all questions in an affidavit, under penalty of perjury. The assessor may require other proof of the facts stated before allowing the exemption. The affidavit shall
 be accompanied by a certificate of the director or other officer of the art gallery or museum in which the property for which an exemption is claimed under this section was made available for display that the property was available for public display in the art gallery or museum for the period specified in subdivision (e).

(c) Sections 255 and 260 shall be applicable to the exemption provided by this section.

(d) The exemption provided by subdivision (a) shall not apply to any work of art loaned by any person who holds works of art primarily for purposes of sale.

(e) The exemption provided by this section shall not apply unless the property was made available for public display in the art gallery or museum for a period of 90 days during the 12-month period immediately preceding the lien date for the year for which
 the exemption is claimed.

If the property was first made available for public display less than 90 days prior to the lien date, the exemption may be granted if the person claiming the exemption certifies in writing that the property will be made available for public display for at least 90 days during the 12-month period commencing with the first day the property was made available for public display.

(f) For purposes of this section, “regularly open to the public” means that the gallery or museum was open to the public not less than 20 hours per week for not less than 35 weeks of the 12-month period immediately preceding the lien date for the year for which the exemption is claimed.

If the gallery or museum has been open for less than 35 weeks during the 12-month period immediately preceding the lien date or for less than 20 hours per week during that period,
 the exemption may be granted if the director or other officer of the gallery or museum certifies in writing that the gallery or museum will be open for not less than 20 hours per week for not less than 35 weeks during the 12-month period beginning with the day the gallery or museum was first opened.

(g) If a person certifies in writing that the property will be made available and the gallery or museum open for the periods specified in subdivisions (e) and (f), and the property is not so made available or the gallery or museum is not so opened, the exemption shall be canceled, and an escape assessment may be made as provided in Section 531.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 179.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

217.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the following articles of personal property that are made available for display in a publicly owned aerospace museum, or an aerospace museum that is regularly open to the public and that is operated by a nonprofit organization that qualifies for exemption pursuant to Section 23701d, shall be exempt from taxation:

(1) Aircraft that have been restored or maintained, whether currently certified or not for flight purposes.

(2) Aircraft donated in perpetuity to the aerospace museum. 

(b) When making a claim for an exemption pursuant to this section, a person claiming the exemption shall give all information required and answer all questions in an affidavit, and shall subscribe and swear to the affidavit, under penalty of perjury. The assessor may require other proof of the facts stated before allowing the exemption. The affidavit shall be accompanied by a certificate of the director or other officer of the aerospace museum in which the property for which an exemption is claimed under this section was made available for display that the property was available for public display in the aerospace museum for the period specified in subdivision (e).

(c) For the 1984–85 assessment year and each assessment year thereafter, the provisions of
 Sections 255 and 260 shall be applicable to the exemption provided by this section. 

(d) The exemption provided by subdivision (a) shall not apply to any aircraft loaned by any person who holds aircraft primarily for purposes of sale. 

(e) The exemption provided by this section shall not apply unless the property was made available for public display in the aerospace museum for a period of 90 days during the 12-month period immediately preceding the lien date for the year for which the exemption is claimed. 

If the property was first made available for public display less than 90 days prior to the lien date, the exemption may be granted if the person claiming the exemption certifies in writing that the property will be made available for public display for at least 90 days during the 12-month period commencing with the first day the
 property was made available for public display. 

(f) For purposes of this section, “regularly open to the public” means that the aerospace museum was open to the public not less than 20 hours per week for not less than 35 weeks of the 12-month period immediately preceding the lien date for the year for which the exemption is claimed. 

If the aerospace museum has been open for less than 35 weeks during the 12-month period immediately preceding the lien date or for less than 20 hours per week during that period, the exemption may be granted if the director or other officer of the aerospace museum certifies in writing that the aerospace museum will be open for not less than 20 hours per week for not less than 35 weeks during the 12-month period beginning with the date the aerospace museum was first opened. 

(g) If a person certifies in
 writing that the property will be made available and the aerospace museum open for the periods specified in subdivisions (e) and (f), and the property is not so made available or the aerospace museum is not so opened, the exemption shall be canceled, and an escape assessment may be made as provided in Section 531.1. 

(h) The exemption provided by this section shall be applicable for the 1979–80 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 200, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

218.

(a) The homeowners’ property tax exemption is in the amount of the assessed value of the dwelling specified in this section, as authorized by subdivision (k) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. That exemption shall be in the amount of seven thousand dollars ($7,000) of the full value of the dwelling.

(b) (1) The exemption does not extend to property that is rented, vacant, under construction on the lien date, or that is a vacation or secondary home of the owner or owners, nor does it apply to property on which an owner receives the
 veterans’ exemption.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a person receiving the exemption is not occupying the dwelling on the lien date because the dwelling was damaged in a misfortune or calamity, the person shall be deemed to occupy that same dwelling as their principal place of residence on the lien date, provided the person’s absence from the dwelling is temporary and the person intends to return to the dwelling when possible to do so. Except as provided in paragraph (3), when a dwelling has been totally destroyed, and thus no dwelling exists on the lien date, the exemption provided by this section shall not be applicable until the structure has been replaced and is occupied as a dwelling.

(3) A dwelling that was totally destroyed in a
 disaster for which the Governor proclaimed a state of emergency, that qualified for the exemption provided by this section prior to the commencement date of the disaster and that has not changed ownership since the commencement date of the disaster, shall be deemed occupied by the person receiving the exemption on the lien date provided the person intends to reconstruct a dwelling on the property and occupy the dwelling as their principal place of residence when it is possible to do so.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a person receiving the exemption is not occupying the dwelling because they are confined to a hospital or other care facility, the person shall be deemed to occupy that dwelling as their principal place of residence, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The person would occupy the dwelling if they were not confined to the hospital or other care facility.

(B) The person intends to return to the dwelling when possible to do so.

(C) The dwelling is not rented or leased to a person that is not described in Section 267(c)(4) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Owner” includes a person purchasing the dwelling under a contract of sale or who holds shares or membership in a cooperative housing corporation, which holding is a requisite to the exclusive right of occupancy of a dwelling.

(2) (A) “Dwelling” means a building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode, whether real property or personal property, and any land on which it may be situated. A two-dwelling unit shall be considered as two separate single-family dwellings.

(B) “Dwelling” includes the following:

(i) A single-family dwelling occupied by an owner thereof as their principal place of residence on the lien date.

(ii) A multiple-dwelling unit occupied by an owner thereof on the lien date as their principal place of residence.

(iii) A condominium occupied by an owner thereof as their principal place of residence on the lien date.

(iv) Premises occupied by the owner of shares or a membership interest in a cooperative housing corporation, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 61, as their principal place of residence on the lien date. Each exemption allowed pursuant to this subdivision shall be deducted from the total assessed valuation of the cooperative housing corporation. The exemption shall be taken into account in apportioning property taxes among owners of shares or membership interests in the cooperative housing corporations so as to benefit those owners who qualify for the exemption.

(d) The exemption provided for in
 subdivision (k) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall first be applied to the building, structure, or other shelter and the excess, if any, shall be applied to any land on which it may be located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.   (SB 520)   Effective October 11, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

218.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Owner” includes a person purchasing the dwelling under a contract of sale or who holds shares or membership in a cooperative housing corporation, which holding is a requisite to the exclusive right of occupancy of a dwelling.

(2) (A) “Dwelling” means a building, structure, or
 other shelter constituting a place of abode, whether real property or personal property, and any land on which it may be situated. A two-dwelling unit shall be considered as two separate single-family dwellings.

(B) “Dwelling” includes the following:

(i) A single-family dwelling occupied by an owner thereof as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date.

(ii) A multiple-dwelling unit occupied by an owner thereof on the lien date as his or her principal place of residence.

(iii) A condominium occupied by an owner thereof as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date.

(iv) Premises occupied by the owner of shares or a membership interest in a cooperative housing
 corporation, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 61, as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date. Each exemption allowed pursuant to this subdivision shall be deducted from the total assessed valuation of the cooperative housing corporation. The exemption shall be taken into account in apportioning property taxes among owners of share or membership interests in the cooperative housing corporations so as to benefit those owners who qualify for the exemption. 

(b) Any dwelling that qualified for an exemption under Section 218 prior to January 9, 2010, that was damaged or destroyed by the earthquake and any other related casualty that occurred as a result of the disaster in the County of Humboldt, as declared by the Governor in January 2010, and that has not changed ownership since January 9, 2010, shall not be disqualified as a “dwelling” or be denied an exemption under this section solely on the basis that the dwelling was
 temporarily damaged or destroyed or was being reconstructed by the owner, or was temporarily uninhabited as a result of restricted access to the property due to the earthquake. 

(c) The exemption provided for in subdivision (k) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall first be applied to the building, structure, or other shelter and the excess, if any, shall be applied to any land on which it may be located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 449, Sec. 4.   (AB 1690)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

218.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Owner” includes a person purchasing the dwelling under a contract of sale or who holds shares or membership in a cooperative housing corporation, which holding is a requisite to the exclusive right of occupancy of a dwelling.

(2) (A) “Dwelling” means a
 building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode, whether real property or personal property, and any land on which it may be situated. A two-dwelling unit shall be considered as two separate single-family dwellings.

(B) “Dwelling” includes the following:

(i) A single-family dwelling occupied by an owner thereof as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date.

(ii) A multiple-dwelling unit occupied by an owner thereof on the lien date as his or her principal place of residence.

(iii) A condominium occupied by an owner thereof as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date.

(iv) Premises occupied by the owner of shares or a membership interest in
 a cooperative housing corporation, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 61, as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date. Each exemption allowed pursuant to this subdivision shall be deducted from the total assessed valuation of the cooperative housing corporation. The exemption shall be taken into account in apportioning property taxes among owners of share or membership interests in the cooperative housing corporations so as to benefit those owners who qualify for the exemption. 

(b) Any dwelling that qualified for an exemption under Section 218 prior to April 4, 2010, that was damaged or destroyed by the earthquake and any other related casualty that occurred as a result of the disaster in the County of Imperial, as declared by the Governor in April 2010, and that has not changed ownership since April 4, 2010, shall not be disqualified as a “dwelling” or be denied an exemption under Section 218 solely on the basis that the
 dwelling was temporarily damaged or destroyed or was being reconstructed by the owner, or was temporarily uninhabited as a result of restricted access to the property due to the earthquake. 

(c) The exemption provided for in subdivision (k) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall first be applied to the building, structure, or other shelter and the excess, if any, shall be applied to any land on which it may be located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 461, Sec. 5.   (AB 2136)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

218.4.

(a) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Owner” includes a person purchasing the dwelling under a contract of sale or who holds shares or membership in a cooperative housing corporation, which holding is a requisite to the exclusive right of occupancy of a dwelling.

(2) (A) “Dwelling” means a
 building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode, whether real property or personal property, and any land on which it may be situated. A two-dwelling unit shall be considered as two separate single-family dwellings.

(B) “Dwelling” includes the following:

(i) A single-family dwelling occupied by an owner thereof as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date.

(ii) A multiple-dwelling unit occupied by an owner thereof on the lien date as his or her principal place of residence.

(iii) A condominium occupied by an owner thereof as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date.

(iv) Premises occupied by the owner of shares or a membership interest in
 a cooperative housing corporation, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 61, as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date. Each exemption allowed pursuant to this subdivision shall be deducted from the total assessed valuation of the cooperative housing corporation. The exemption shall be taken into account in apportioning property taxes among owners of share or membership interests in the cooperative housing corporations so as to benefit those owners who qualify for the exemption. 

(b) Any dwelling that qualified for an exemption under Section 218 prior to the commencement dates of the wildfires listed in the Governor’s disaster proclamation of August 2009, that was damaged or destroyed by the wildfires and any other related casualty that occurred as a result of this disaster in the Counties of Los Angeles and Monterey, as declared by the Governor in August 2009, and that has not changed ownership since the commencement dates
 of these disasters as listed in the proclamations, shall not be disqualified as a “dwelling” or be denied an exemption under Section 218 solely on the basis that the dwelling was temporarily damaged or destroyed or was being reconstructed by the owner, or was temporarily uninhabited as a result of restricted access to the property due to the wildfires. 

(c) Any dwelling that qualified for an exemption under Section 218 prior to August 30, 2009, that was damaged or destroyed by the wildfires and any other related casualty that occurred as a result of this disaster in the County of Placer, as declared by the Governor in August 2009, and that has not changed ownership since August 30, 2009, shall not be disqualified as a “dwelling” or be denied an exemption under Section 218 solely on the basis that the dwelling was temporarily damaged or destroyed or was being reconstructed by the owner, or was temporarily uninhabited as a result of restricted
 access to the property due to the wildfires. 

(d) Any dwelling that qualified for an exemption under Section 218 prior to the commencement dates of the severe winter storms listed in the Governor’s disaster proclamations of January 2010, that was damaged or destroyed by the severe rainstorms, heavy snows, floods, or mudslides that occurred as a result of these disasters in the Counties of Calaveras, Imperial, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Francisco, and Siskiyou, as declared by the Governor in January 2010, and that has not changed ownership since the commencement dates of these disasters as listed in the proclamations, shall not be disqualified as a “dwelling” or be denied an exemption under Section 218 solely on the basis that the dwelling was temporarily damaged or destroyed or was being reconstructed by the owner, or was temporarily uninhabited as a result of restricted access to the property due to floods, mudslides,
 rockslides, or washed-out or damaged roads.

(e) Any dwelling that qualified for an exemption under Section 218 prior to July 26, 2010, that was damaged or destroyed by the wildfires and any other related casualty that occurred as a result of the disaster in the County of Kern, as declared by the Governor in July 2010, and that has not changed ownership since July 26, 2010, shall not be disqualified as a “dwelling” or be denied an exemption under this section solely on the basis that the dwelling was temporarily damaged or destroyed or was being reconstructed by the owner, or was temporarily uninhabited as a result of restricted access to the property due to the wildfires. 

(f) The exemption provided for in subdivision (k) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall first be applied to the building, structure, or other shelter and the excess, if any, shall be
 applied to any land on which it may be located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 447, Sec. 4.   (AB 1662)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

218.5.

In order to assure the accuracy of the state’s reimbursements for the homeowners’ property tax exemption and to prevent duplications of the exemptions within the state and improper overlapping with other benefits provided by law, county assessors shall supply information from homeowners’ property tax exemption claims and county records as is specified by written request of the board, and with the concurrence of the Controller, necessary to fully identify all homeowners’ property tax exemption claims allowed by the assessors. The board may specify that the information include all or a part of the names and social security numbers of claimants and spouses and the identity and
 location of the dwelling to which the exemption applies. The information may be required in the form of data processing media or other media and in such format as is compatible with the recordkeeping processes of the counties and the auditing procedures of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 208.)
-------------------------------------------

218.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Owner” includes a person purchasing the dwelling under a contract of sale or who holds shares or membership in a cooperative housing corporation, which holding is a requisite to the exclusive right of occupancy of a dwelling.

(2) (A) “Dwelling” means a
 building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode, whether real property or personal property, and any land on which it may be situated. A two-dwelling unit shall be considered as two separate single-family dwellings.

(B) “Dwelling” includes the following:

(i) A single-family dwelling occupied by an owner thereof as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date.

(ii) A multiple-dwelling unit occupied by an owner thereof on the lien date as his or her principal place of residence.

(iii) A condominium occupied by an owner thereof as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date.

(iv) Premises occupied by the owner of shares or a membership interest in
 a cooperative housing corporation, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 61, as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date. Each exemption allowed pursuant to this subdivision shall be deducted from the total assessed valuation of the cooperative housing corporation. The exemption shall be taken into account in apportioning property taxes among owners of share or membership interests in the cooperative housing corporations so as to benefit those owners who qualify for the exemption. 

(b) Any dwelling that qualified for an exemption under Section 218 prior to September 9, 2010, that was damaged or destroyed by the explosion and fire that occurred in the County of San Mateo, as declared by the Governor in September 2010, and that has not changed ownership since September 9, 2010, shall not be disqualified as a “dwelling” or be denied an exemption under this section solely on the basis that the dwelling was temporarily damaged or
 destroyed or was being reconstructed by the owner, or was temporarily uninhabited as a result of restricted access to the property due to the explosion and fire. 

(c) The exemption provided for in subdivision (k) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall first be applied to the building, structure, or other shelter and the excess, if any, shall be applied to any land on which it may be located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 6th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 4.   (AB 11 6x)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

219.
